District of Columbia statutes.
32-214

Board of Education to enforce law; inspection of places in which minors are employed.

It shall be the duty of the Board of Education to cause all the provisions of this subchapter to be enforced, to make complaints against persons violating its provisions, and to prosecute violations of the same. The Board of Education, its inspectors, and agents are empowered and instructed to visit and inspect at any time, and as often as shall be necessary in order effectively to enforce the provisions of this subchapter, all places where minors are employed, and shall have authority to enter any place or establishment covered by the terms of this subchapter, and to have access to work or vacation permits kept on file by the employer and such other records as may aid in the enforcement of this subchapter.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1003, ch. 908, § 16
renumbered as § 14 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(17), 23 DCR 521
1981 Ed., § 36-514.
1973 Ed., § 36-216.